Utah, session 2026, HB156.
Section 1. Section 26B-7-408.5 is enacted to read:26B-7-408.5. Directed blood product transfusion.(1)As used in this section, "blood product" means the same as that term is defined in Section 26B-7-408.(2)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), health care provider or health care facility may not prohibit a patient from providing, through a blood establishment complying with all federal requirements for the collection of blood product, the patient's own blood product or the blood product of the patient's directed donor for any potential transfusion related to the patient's health care.(b)Subsection (2)(a) does not apply if:(i)the donation or transfusion of the blood product would be detrimental to the donor or patient;(ii)insufficient time exists prior to the surgery or procedure to coordinate and arrange the patient's provision of the blood product;(iii)the surgery or medical procedure is for emergency medical services; or(iv)the health care facility where the surgery or procedure is performed offers a process for the patient to provide the patient's own blood product or the blood product of the patient's directed donor.(3)A health care provider or facility operating within the scope of the provider's or facility's license is immune from liability for injury, damages, or death occurring as a result of using the blood product provided by the patient under Subsection (2)(a), unless the provider's or facility's gross negligence regarding the blood product or transfusion contributed to the injury, damages, or death.(4)Nothing in this section shall be construed to conflict with federal law governing the collection, donation, sale, or use of a blood product.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.